Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-264
Authority; money; deposits; secured; expenditures.

All money of the authority, except as otherwise authorized or provided in the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, shall be deposited as soon as practical in a separate account or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of this state or in national banking associations. The money in such accounts shall be paid out on checks signed by the executive director or other officers or employees of the authority as the authority authorizes. All deposits of money shall, if required by the authority, be secured in such a manner as the authority determines to be prudent, and all banks or trust companies may give security for the deposits.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 64;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 62.